Alabama, session 2026rs, SB61.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
73 Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
74 term "eligibility" refers to eligibility for participation in
75 or receipt of benefits from Medicaid.
76 (b)(1) The Alabama Medicaid Agency may not accept
77 eligibility determinations from an Exchange established under
78 42 U.S.C. § 18041(c).
79 (2) The agency may accept assessments from an Exchange
80 established under 42 U.S.C. § 18041(c), provided that the
81 agency verifies eligibility and makes eligibility
82 determinations.
83 (c) Except where required by federal law, the Alabama
84 Medicaid Agency may not:
Page 3

Medicaid Agency may not:
SB61 INTRODUCED
85 (1) Accept self-attestation of income, residency, age,
86 household composition, caretaker or relative status, or
87 receipt of other coverage without verifying that information
88 prior to enrollment; or
89 (2) Request the authority to waive or decline to
90 periodically check any available income-related data sources
91 to verify eligibility.
92 (d) The Alabama Medicaid Agency shall enter into data
93 matching agreements to receive and review information that may
94 indicate a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility
95 and cross-check households enrolled in Medicaid with other
96 state data sets, including all of the following:
97 (1) On at least a monthly basis, information from each
98 of the following:
99 a. The Alabama Department of Public Health, including,
100 but not limited to, death records.
101 b. The State Department of Human Resources, including,
102 but not limited to, potential changes in residency as
103 identified by out-of-state electronic benefit (EBT)
104 transactions.
105 c. The Department of Corrections, including, but not
106 limited to, incarceration status.
107 (2) On at least a quarterly basis, information from
108 each of the following:
109 a. The Department of Workforce, including, but not
110 limited to, changes in employment, income, wages, assets, or
111 disability status.
112 b. The Department of Revenue, including, but not
Page 4

b. The Department of Revenue, including, but not
SB61 INTRODUCED
113 limited to, potential changes in income, wages, or residency
114 as identified by tax records.
115 (e) At least once a month, the Alabama Medicaid Agency
116 shall assess continued eligibility and act on any changes that
117 may affect eligibility based on a review of data from the
118 following federal sources:
119 (1) From the United States Social Security
120 Administration, earned income information, death register
121 information, incarceration records, supplemental security
122 income information, beneficiary records, earnings information,
123 and pension information.
124 (2) From the United States Department of Health and
125 Human Services, income and employment information maintained
126 in the National Directory of New Hires database and child
127 support enforcement data.
128 (3) From the United States Department of Housing and
129 Urban Development, payment and earnings information.
130 (4) From the United States Federal Bureau of
131 Investigation, national fleeing felon information.
132 (5) From the United States Postal Service, change of
133 address information.
134 (f) Beginning not later than October 1, 2029, the
135 Alabama Medicaid Agency shall submit enrollment information to
136 the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services' national
137 Medicaid enrollment database on a monthly basis for the
138 purpose of identifying individuals who are enrolled in
139 Medicaid in more than one state.
140 (g) On at least a quarterly basis, the Alabama Medicaid
Page 5

(g) On at least a quarterly basis, the Alabama Medicaid
SB61 INTRODUCED
141 Agency shall make available on its public website all of the
142 following data from findings on noncompliance and fraud
143 investigations, provided the data is presented in the
144 aggregate and does not include confidential or personally
145 identifying information:
146 (1) The number of Medicaid cases investigated for
147 intentional program violations or fraud.
148 (2) The total number of Medicaid cases referred to the
149 Attorney General's office for prosecution.
150 (3) Improper payments and expenditures.
151 (4) Monies received.
152 (5) Aggregate data concerning improper payments and
153 ineligible recipients as a percentage of those investigated
154 and reviewed.
155 (h) The Alabama Medicaid Agency shall adopt rules to
156 implement and administer this section.
157 Section 2. (a) For the purposes of this section, the term
158 "eligibility" refers to eligibility for food assistance,
159 including the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
160 (SNAP).
161 (b) The State Department of Human Resources shall enter
162 into data matching agreements to receive and review
163 information that may indicate a change in circumstances that
164 may affect eligibility and cross-check households enrolled in
165 food assistance with other state data sets, including all of
166 the following:
167 (1) On at least a monthly basis, information from each of
168 the following:
169 a. The Alabama Department of Public Health, including,
170 but not limited to, death records.
Page 6

but not limited to, death records.
SB61 INTRODUCED
171 b. The State Department of Human Resources, including,
172 but not limited to, potential changes in residency as
173 identified by out-of-state electronic benefit (EBT)
174 transactions.
175 c. The Department of Corrections, including, but not
176 limited to, incarceration status.
177 (2) On at least a quarterly basis, information from each
178 of the following:
179 a. The Department of Workforce, including, but not
180 limited to, changes in employment, income, wages, assets, or
181 disability status.
182 b. The Department of Revenue, including, but not limited
183 to, potential changes in income, wages, or residency as
184 identified by tax records.
185 (c) At least once a month, the State Department of Human
186 Resources shall assess continued eligibility and act on any
187 changes that may affect eligibility based on a review of data
188 from the following federal sources:
189 (1) From the United States Social Security
190 Administration, earned income information, death register
191 information, incarceration records, supplemental security
192 income information, beneficiary records, earnings information,
193 and pension information.
194 (2) From the United States Department of Health and Human
195 Services, income and employment information maintained in the
196 National Directory of New Hires database and child support
197 enforcement data.
198 (3) From the United States Department of Housing and
199 Urban Development, payment and earnings information.
200 (4) From the United States Federal Bureau of
201 Investigation, national fleeing felon information.
202 (d) On at least a quarterly basis, the State Department
203 of Human Resources shall make available on its public website
Page 7

of Human Resources shall make available on its public website
SB61 INTRODUCED
204 all of the following data from findings on noncompliance and
205 fraud investigations, provided the data is presented in the
206 aggregate and does not include confidential or personally
207 identifying information:
208 (1) The number of households investigated for intentional
209 program violations or fraud.
210 (2) The total number of households referred to the
211 Attorney General's office for prosecution.
212 (3) Improper payments and expenditures.
213 (4) Monies received.
214 (5) Aggregate data concerning improper payments and
215 ineligible recipients as a percentage of those investigated
216 and reviewed.
217 (6) The aggregate amount of funds expended by EBT
218 transactions in each state outside of Alabama.
219 (e) The State Department of Human Resources shall adopt
220 rules to implement and administer this section.
221 Section 3. (a) Except as otherwise expressly required
222 by federal law, the State Department of Human Resources may
223 not do any of the following:
224 (1) Grant categorical eligibility for the Supplemental
225 Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) under 7 U.S.C. § 2014(a)
226 or 7 C.F.R. § 273.2(j)(2)(ii) for any noncash, in-kind, or
227 other benefit.
228 (2) Apply gross income standards for SNAP higher than
229 the standards specified in 7 U.S.C. § 2014(c) or allowable
230 financial resources higher than the standards specified in 7
231 U.S.C. § 2014(g)(1), except as provided in subsection (b).
232 (3) Grant categorical eligibility to exempt households
233 from the gross income standards or allowable financial
Page 8

from the gross income standards or allowable financial
SB61 INTRODUCED
234 resource standards referenced in subdivisions (1) and (2) for
235 any noncash, in-kind, or other benefit.
236 (b) The State Department of Human Resources may apply
237 alternative vehicle allowance standards in accordance with 7
238 U.S.C. §2014(g)(2)(D) when counting allowable financial
239 resources and household income for purposes of determining
240 SNAP eligibility.
241 Section 4. Unless otherwise prohibited under federal
242 law, the State Department of Human Resources shall assign
243 certification periods for the Supplemental Nutrition Program
244 (SNAP) as follows:
245 (1) A period not longer than four months for: (i)
246 households with zero net income; (ii) households that include
247 an able-bodied adult without dependents; and (iii) households
248 whose circumstances are determined by the department to be
249 unstable.
250 (2) A period of one month or two months for households
251 that the department determines will become ineligible for SNAP
252 in the near future.
253 Section 5. This act shall become effective on October
254 1, 2026.
Page 9